Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.070

Annual report of institutions to office of student financial assistance.

Each eligible institution shall submit to the office of student financial assistance an annual report in accordance with such requirements as are adopted by the office.

[ 2012 c 229 s 602; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 147; 1994 c 130 s 7; 1985 c 370 s 61; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.